Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1212
Qualified physician, defined.

Qualified physician means an individual who is licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and meets any other requirements established by rule and regulation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 496.